Washington statutes.
RCW 32.08.020

Notice of intention.

At the time of executing the incorporation certificate, the proposed incorporators shall sign a notice of intention to organize the mutual savings bank, which shall specify their names, the name of the proposed corporation, and its location as set forth in the incorporation certificate. The original of such notice shall be filed in the office of the director within sixty days after the date of its execution, and a copy thereof shall be published at least once a week for four successive weeks in a newspaper designated by the director, the publication to be commenced within thirty days after such designation. At least fifteen days before the incorporation certificate is submitted to the director for examination, as provided in RCW 32.08.030, a copy of such notice shall be served upon each savings bank doing business in the city or town named in the incorporation certificate, by mailing such copy (postage prepaid) to such bank.

[ 1994 c 92 s 308; 1955 c 13 s 32.08.020. Prior: 1915 c 175 s 2; RRS s 3314.]